Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4979.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3. (1) There is levied upon and there shall be collected from every person in this state a specific tax, including both the local community stabilization share and the state share, for the privilege of using, storing, or consuming tangible personal property in this state at a total combined rate equal to 6% of the price of the property or services specified in section 3a, or 3b, or 3g. The tax levied under this act applies to a person who acquires tangible personal property or services that are subject to the tax levied under this act for any tax-exempt use who subsequently converts the tangible personal property or service to a taxable use, including an interim taxable use. If tangible personal property or services are converted to a taxable use, the tax levied under this act shall be is imposed without regard to regardless of any subsequent tax-exempt use. Penalties and interest shall be added to the tax if applicable as provided in this act. For the purpose of the proper administration of this act and to prevent the evasion of the tax, all of the following shall be are presumed: (a) That tangible personal property purchased is subject to the tax if brought into this state within not later than 90 days of after the purchase date and is considered as acquired for storage, use, or other consumption in this state. (b) That tangible personal property used solely for personal, nonbusiness purposes that is purchased outside of this state and that is not an aircraft is exempt from the tax levied under this act if 1 or more of the following conditions are satisfied: (i) The property is purchased by a person who is not a resident of this state at the time of purchase and is brought into this state more than 90 days after the date of purchase. (ii) The property is purchased by a person who is a resident of this state at the time of purchase and is brought into this state more than 360 days after the date of purchase. (2) The tax imposed by this section for the privilege of using, storing, or consuming a vehicle, ORV, manufactured housing, aircraft, snowmobile, or watercraft shall must be collected before the transfer of the vehicle, ORV, manufactured housing, aircraft, snowmobile, or watercraft, except a transfer to a licensed dealer or retailer for purposes of resale that arises by reason of a transaction made by a person who does not transfer vehicles, ORVs, manufactured housing, aircraft, snowmobiles, or watercraft in the ordinary course of his or her the person's business done in this state. The secretary of state shall collect the tax on a vehicle, ORV, snowmobile, and or watercraft shall be collected by the secretary of state before the transfer of the vehicle, ORV, snowmobile, or watercraft registration. The department of licensing and regulatory affairs, manufactured housing commission, or its agent shall collect the tax on manufactured housing shall be collected by the department of licensing and regulatory affairs, mobile home commission, or its agent before the transfer of the certificate of title. The department shall collect the tax on an aircraft. shall be collected by the department of treasury. The price tax base of a new or previously owned car or truck held for resale by a dealer and that is not exempt under section 4(1)(c) is the purchase price of the car or truck multiplied by 2.5% plus $30.00 per month beginning with the month that the dealer uses the car or truck in a nonexempt manner. (3) The following transfers or purchases are not subject to use tax: (a) A transaction or a portion of a transaction if the transferee or purchaser is the spouse, mother, father, brother, sister, parent, sibling, child, stepparent, stepchild, stepbrother, stepsister, stepsibling, grandparent, grandchild, legal ward, or a legally appointed guardian with a certified letter of guardianship, of the transferor. (b) A transaction or a portion of a transaction if the transfer is a gift to a beneficiary in the administration of an estate. (c) If a vehicle, ORV, manufactured housing, aircraft, snowmobile, or watercraft that has once been subjected to the Michigan sales or use tax is transferred in connection with the organization, reorganization, dissolution, or partial liquidation of an incorporated or unincorporated business and the beneficial ownership is not changed. (d) If an insurance company licensed to conduct business in this state acquires ownership of a late model distressed vehicle as defined in section 12a of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.12a, 257.1 to 257.923, through payment of damages in response to a claim or when if the person who that owned the vehicle before the insurance company reacquires ownership from the company as part of the settlement of a claim. (4) The department may utilize the services, information, or records of any other department or agency of state government or of the authority in the performance of its duties under this act, and other departments or agencies of state government and the authority are required to shall furnish those services, information, or records upon on the request of the department. (5) Beginning on October 1, 2015, the specific tax levied under subsection (1) includes both a state share tax levied by this state and a local community stabilization share tax authorized by 2014 PA 80 and levied by the authority, which replaces the reduced state share at the following rates in each of the following state fiscal years: (a) For fiscal year 2015-2016, the local community stabilization share tax rate to be levied by the authority is that rate calculated by the department of treasury on behalf of the authority sufficient to generate $96,400,000.00 in revenue and the state share tax rate is that rate determined by subtracting the local community stabilization share tax rate from 6%. (b) For fiscal year 2016-2017, the local community stabilization share tax rate to be levied by the authority is that rate calculated by the department of treasury on behalf of the authority sufficient to generate $380,900,000.00 in revenue and the state share tax rate is that rate determined by subtracting the local community stabilization share tax rate from 6%. (c) For fiscal year 2017-2018, the local community stabilization share tax rate to be levied by the authority is that rate calculated by the department of treasury on behalf of the authority sufficient to generate $410,800,000.00 in revenue and the state share tax rate is that rate determined by subtracting the local community stabilization share tax rate from 6%. (d) For fiscal year 2018-2019, the local community stabilization share tax rate to be levied by the authority is that rate calculated by the department of treasury on behalf of the authority sufficient to generate $438,000,000.00 in revenue and the state share tax rate is that rate determined by subtracting the local community stabilization share tax rate from 6%. (e) For fiscal year 2019-2020, the local community stabilization share tax rate to be levied by the authority is that rate calculated by the department of treasury on behalf of the authority sufficient to generate $465,900,000.00 in revenue and the state share tax rate is that rate determined by subtracting the local community stabilization share tax rate from 6%. (f) For fiscal year 2020-2021, the local community stabilization share tax rate to be levied by the authority is that rate calculated by the department of treasury on behalf of the authority sufficient to generate $491,500,000.00 in revenue and the state share tax rate is that rate determined by subtracting the local community stabilization share tax rate from 6%. (g) For fiscal year 2021-2022, the local community stabilization share tax rate to be levied by the authority is that rate calculated by the department of treasury on behalf of the authority sufficient to generate $521,300,000.00 in revenue and the state share tax rate is that rate determined by subtracting the local community stabilization share tax rate from 6%. (h) For fiscal year 2022-2023, the local community stabilization share tax rate to be levied by the authority is that rate calculated by the department of treasury on behalf of the authority sufficient to generate $548,000,000.00 in revenue and the state share tax rate is that rate determined by subtracting the local community stabilization share tax rate from 6%. (i) For fiscal year 2023-2024, the local community stabilization share tax rate to be levied by the authority is that rate calculated by the department of treasury on behalf of the authority sufficient to generate $561,700,000.00 in revenue and the state share tax rate is that rate determined by subtracting the local community stabilization share tax rate from 6%. (j) For fiscal year 2024-2025, the local community stabilization share tax rate to be levied by the authority is that rate calculated by the department of treasury on behalf of the authority sufficient to generate $569,800,000.00 in revenue and the state share tax rate is that rate determined by subtracting the local community stabilization share tax rate from 6%. (k) For fiscal year 2025-2026, the local community stabilization share tax rate to be levied by the authority is that rate calculated by the department of treasury on behalf of the authority sufficient to generate $571,400,000.00 in revenue and the state share tax rate is that rate determined by subtracting the local community stabilization share tax rate from 6%. (l) For fiscal year 2026-2027, the local community stabilization share tax rate to be levied by the authority is that rate calculated by the department of treasury on behalf of the authority sufficient to generate $572,200,000.00 in revenue and the state share tax rate is that rate determined by subtracting the local community stabilization share tax rate from 6%. (m) For fiscal year 2027-2028, the local community stabilization share tax rate to be levied by the authority is that rate calculated by the department of treasury on behalf of the authority sufficient to generate $572,600,000.00 in revenue and the state share tax rate is that rate determined by subtracting the local community stabilization share tax rate from 6%. (n) For fiscal year 2028-2029 and each fiscal year thereafter, the local community stabilization share tax rate to be levied by the authority is that rate calculated by the department of treasury on behalf of the authority sufficient to generate the amount distributed under this section in the immediately preceding year adjusted by the personal property growth factor and the state share tax rate is that rate determined by subtracting the local community stabilization share tax rate from 6%. (6) The state share includes the portion of the use tax imposed at the additional rate of 2% approved by the electors of this state on March 15, 1994 and dedicated for aid to schools under section 21(2). The local community stabilization share does not include the portion of the use tax imposed at the additional rate of 2% approved by the electors of this state on March 15, 1994. (7) The total combined rate of the tax levied by this state and the authority under this act, including both the state share, as reduced by 2014 PA 80, and the local community stabilization share, shall must not exceed the constitutional limit of 6% under section 8 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963. The authority shall not increase any tax or tax rate, but is authorized to and shall levy the local community stabilization share at the rate provided in subsection (5). Sec. 3g. (1) The use or consumption of advertising services is taxed under this act in the same manner as tangible personal property is taxed under this act. (2) The use or consumption of advertising services is considered to occur in this state if the advertisement is delivered, disseminated, displayed, or otherwise made available to individuals or businesses located within this state, regardless of the location of the provider of the advertising services. If an advertisement is disseminated to an audience located in multiple states, the tax applies to the portion of the advertising service that is reasonably attributable to individuals or businesses located within this state. If the location of the audience cannot be reasonably determined, the advertisement must be sourced to the purchaser's billing address. (3) Notwithstanding anything in this act to the contrary, the tax must be collected and remitted by the provider of the advertising services. (4) As used in this section: (a) "Advertisement" means a representation that is intended to induce, or is likely to induce, directly or indirectly, the purchase or use of any property or service. (b) "Advertising services" includes both of the following: (i) The provision of an advertisement to a client. (ii) The distribution of an advertisement to an audience on behalf of a client, whether through the internet, television, radio, newspaper, magazines, billboards, or any other means. (c) "Billboard" means that term as defined in section 2 of the highway advertising act of 1972, 1972 PA 106, MCL 252.302. Sec. 21. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, all money received and collected under this act must be deposited by the department of treasury in the state treasury to the credit of the general fund, to be disbursed only by appropriations by the legislature. (2) The collections from the use tax imposed at the additional rate of 2% approved by the electors on March 15, 1994 must be deposited in the state school aid fund. (3) In addition to the money deposited in the state school aid fund under subsection (2), from the money received and collected under this act for the state share, an amount equal to the sum of the following, as determined by the department, must be deposited in the state school aid fund: (a) All revenue lost under the state education tax act, 1993 PA 331, MCL 211.901 to 211.906, as a result of the exemption of personal property under sections 9m, 9n, and 9o of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.9m, 211.9n, and 211.9o. (b) All revenue lost from basic school operating mills as a result of the exemption of personal property under sections 9m, 9n, and 9o of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.9m, 211.9n, and 211.9o. (c) All revenue lost to the state school aid fund as a result of the exemption under section 4(1)(gg). (d) All revenue lost to the state school aid fund as a result of the exemption under section 4cc. A person that claims an exemption under section 4cc shall report the purchase price of the data center equipment as defined in section 4cc and any other information necessary to determine the amount of revenue lost to the state school aid fund as a result of the exemption under section 4cc annually on a form at the time and in a manner prescribed by the department. The report required under this subdivision must not include any remittance for tax and does not constitute a return or otherwise alleviate the person's obligations under section 6. (e) All revenue lost to the state school aid fund as a result of the exclusion under section 2(1)(f)(xv). (4) Money received and collected under this act for the local community stabilization share is not state funds, must not be credited to the state treasury, and must be transmitted to the authority for deposit in the treasury of the authority, to be disbursed by the authority only as authorized under the local community stabilization authority act, 2014 PA 86, MCL 123.1341 to 123.1362. The local community stabilization share is a local tax, not a state tax, and money received and collected for the local community stabilization share is money of the authority and not money of this state. (5) Beginning October 1, 2016 and the first day of each calendar quarter thereafter, from the money received and collected under this act for the state share, an amount equal to the collections for the calendar quarter that is 2 calendar quarters immediately preceding the current calendar quarter of the tax imposed under this act at the additional rate of 2% approved by the electors on March 15, 1994 from the use, storage, or consumption of aviation fuel must be distributed as follows: (a) An amount equal to 35% of the collections of the tax imposed at a rate of 2% on the use, storage, or consumption of aviation fuel must be deposited in the state aeronautics fund and must be expended, on appropriation, only for those purposes authorized in the aeronautics code of the state of Michigan, 1945 PA 327, MCL 259.1 to 259.208. (b) An amount equal to 65% of the collections of the tax imposed at a rate of 2% on the use, storage, or consumption of aviation fuel must be deposited in the qualified airport fund and must be expended, on appropriation, only for those purposes authorized under section 35 of the aeronautics code of the state of Michigan, 1945 PA 327, MCL 259.35. (6) The department shall, on an annual basis, reconcile the amounts distributed under subsection (5) during each fiscal year with the amounts actually collected for a particular fiscal year and shall make any necessary adjustments, positive or negative, to the amounts to be distributed for the next successive calendar quarter that begins January 1. The state treasurer or the state treasurer's designee shall annually provide to the operator of each qualified airport a report of the reconciliation performed under this subsection. The reconciliation report is subject to the confidentiality restrictions and penalties provided in section 28(1)(f) of 1941 PA 122, MCL 205.28. (7) Beginning with the fiscal year ending September 30, 2024 and each fiscal year thereafter, from the money received and collected under this act for the state share, $75,000,000.00 must be deposited into the local government reimbursement fund created in section 3a of the Michigan trust fund act, 2000 PA 489, MCL 12.253a. (8) From the money received and collected under this act for the state share, an amount equal to the collections of the tax imposed at a rate of 6% on the use or consumption of advertising services under section 3g must be deposited in the Michigan transportation fund. (9) (8) As used in this section: (a) "Aviation fuel" means fuel as that term is defined in section 4 of the aeronautics code of the state of Michigan, 1945 PA 327, MCL 259.4. (b) "Michigan transportation fund" means the Michigan transportation fund created in section 10 of 1951 PA 51, MCL 247.660. (c) (b) "Qualified airport" means that term as defined in section 109 of the aeronautics code of the state of Michigan, 1945 PA 327, MCL 259.109. (d) (c) "Qualified airport fund" means the qualified airport fund created in section 34(2) of the aeronautics code of the state of Michigan, 1945 PA 327, MCL 259.34. (e) (d) "State aeronautics fund" means the state aeronautics fund created in section 34(1) of the aeronautics code of the state of Michigan, 1945 PA 327, MCL 259.34. (f) (e) "State school aid fund" means the state school aid fund established in section 11 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963.